District of Columbia statutes.
39-201

Authority of Council.

The enactment of this chapter by the Council is done pursuant to the authority vested in the Council under § 1-204.04(b).

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-22, § 2, 22 DCR 2083
1973 Ed., § 31-1901.
1981 Ed., § 31-2001.